Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-20,158
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Administrative dissolution; grounds.

The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under section 21-20,159 to administratively dissolve a corporation if:

(1) The corporation is without a registered agent or registered office in this state for sixty days or more;

(2) The corporation does not notify the Secretary of State within sixty days that its registered agent or registered office has been changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or that its registered office has been discontinued; or

(3) The corporation's period of duration stated in its articles of incorporation expires.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 158.